Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EXPEDITED PROCESSES BY TEACHER STANDARDS
AND PRACTICES COMMISSION
SECTION 1.  ORS 342.125 is amended to read:
342.125. (1)[ (a)] Teaching licenses shall be issued and renewed by the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission by the authority of the State  of Oregon, subject to ORS 342.120 to 342.430 and
the rules of the commission.
[(b)] (2) Notwithstanding any requirements prescribed for issuance of a [ teaching] license,  a
person whose application for a [ teaching] license is pending may [ teach] be employed in the public
schools of this state for 90 calendar days after the date of submission of the application if:
[(A)] (a) The person is not ineligible for a [ teaching] license following background checks con-
ducted by the Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission, including a criminal records check
as provided in ORS 181A.195 and a background check through an interstate clearinghouse of  re-
voked and suspended licenses;
[(B)] (b) The school district has completed the review of the employment  history of the person
as required by ORS 339.374; and
[(C)] (c) The person  and the school district have complied with any other requirements estab-
lished by the commission by rule.
[(2)] (3) Subject to ORS 342.130 and to subsection [ (3)] (4) of  this section, licenses shall be of the
following types:
(a) Preliminary teaching license.
(b) Professional teaching license.
(c) Distinguished teacher leader license.
(d) Preliminary personnel service license.
(e) Professional personnel service license.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 1
(f) Preliminary administrative license.
(g) Professional administrative license.
(h) Reciprocal license.
(i) Legacy license.
[(3)] (4) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may establish other types of teaching
licenses as the commission considers necessary for operation  of the public schools of the state and
may prescribe the qualifications for the licenses. However, no  license established under the au-
thority of this subsection is required for a regular classroom teaching position in  the public schools.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a) The Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission shall establish a public charter
school teacher and administrator  registry. The commission shall require the applicant and the public
charter  school  to jointly submit an application requesting registration as a public charter school
teacher or administrator. The application shall include:
(A) A description of the specific teaching or administrator position the applicant will fill;
(B) A description of the background of the  applicant that is relevant to the teaching or admin-
istrator position, including any post-secondary education or other experience; and
(C) Documentation as required by the commission for the purposes of conducting a criminal  re-
cords check as provided in ORS 181A.195 and  a background check through an interstate clearing-
house of revoked and suspended licenses.
(b) Subject to the results of the criminal records check and background check and  to informa-
tion received under ORS 342.143 (2), the commission shall approve the application for registration.
The commission may deny a request for registration only on the basis  of the criminal records check,
the background  check through an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and suspended licenses or the
information received under ORS  342.143 (2). The registration is valid for a term established by the
commission and, subject to information  received under ORS 342.143 (2), may be renewed upon joint
application from the teacher or administrator and the public charter school.
(c) A registration as a public charter school teacher qualifies  its holder to accept the teaching
position described in the application in the  public charter school that submitted the application with
the holder of the registration.
(d) A registration as a public charter school administrator qualifies its holder to  accept the
administrator position described in the application in the  public charter school that submitted the
application with the holder of the registration.
(6)(a) The Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission shall adopt an expedited process
for the issuance of any license established  pursuant to this section. The expedited process
may require the following:
(A) The showing of an urgent situation; and
(B) The joint request for the expedited process from the applicant for the license and:
(i) The school district superintendent or school district board;
(ii) The public charter school governing body; or
(iii) The education service district  superintendent or board of directors of the education
service district.
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, the  commission shall issue a
license as provided by this subsection within two working days after receiving a completed
application.
(c) The commission may limit the number of applications the  commission will accept
under this subsection  from a school district or an education service district to not more than
100 applications in a period of two working days.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the commission may not distinguish between a school
district or an education service  district involved in a labor dispute and any other school
district or education service district.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 342.120 is amended to read:
342.120. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 2
(1) “Administrator” includes but is not limited to all  superintendents, assistant superintendents,
principals and academic program directors in public schools or education service districts who have
direct responsibility for  supervision or evaluation of licensed teachers and who are compensated for
their services from public funds.
(2) “Administrative license” means a license issued under ORS 342.125 [ (2)(f)] (3)(f) or (g).
(3) “Approved  educator preparation program” means a licensure program that is offered by an
approved educator preparation provider and meets the standards  of the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission.
(4) “Approved  educator preparation provider” means an entity that meets the standards of the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission  for preparation of licensed educators for preprimary
programs through grade 12.
(5) “Instruction” includes preparation of  curriculum, assessment and direction of learning in
class, in small groups, in individual situations, online, in the library and  in guidance and counseling,
but does not include  the provision of related services, as defined in ORS 343.035, to a child identified
as a child with a disability pursuant to ORS 343.146 to  343.183 when provided in accordance with
ORS 343.221.
(6) “Instructional assistant” means a classified school employee  who does not require a license
to teach, who is employed by a school district or education  service district and whose assignment
consists of and  is limited to assisting a licensed teacher in accordance with rules established by the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(7) “Teacher” includes all licensed employees in the public schools or employed by an education
service district who have direct responsibility for  instruction or coordination of educational pro-
grams and who are compensated for their services from public funds. “Teacher”  does not include a
school nurse as defined in ORS 342.455 or an instructional assistant.
(8) “Teaching license” means a license issued under ORS 342.125 or 342.144.
(9) “Underrepresented person” means:
(a) A person having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa, but who is not  Hispanic;
(b) A person of Hispanic culture or origin;
(c) A person having origins in any of the original peoples of the Far East,  Southeast Asia, the
Indian subcontinent or the Pacific Islands; or
(d) An American Indian  or Alaskan Native having origins in any of the original peoples of North
America.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 342.127 is amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed $350 for evaluation of the initial  application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant is  eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
(b) A fee not to exceed $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a  fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper  license. If the educator is certified by a national professional organization
for teaching standards recognized by the commission, the commission shall  renew the license with-
out charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed $800 for a beginning educator assessment conducted  in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee  not to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher  or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of  an appli-
cant requesting  licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other than an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 3
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of  $200 from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal  of the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an  expired license. The require-
ments for  reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance with
rules of the commission.
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on  the license, the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a  timely application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the  commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $300 for the reinstatement of a license
that has been suspended or revoked by the  commission for gross neglect of duty or gross unfitness
under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license [ to a substitute teacher ], the commission shall collect a fee not to  exceed $200 for the
issuance of [ any emergency license to a substitute teacher ] any license through an expedited  process
under ORS 342.125 (6)  at the request of  any school district, public charter school or education
service district that seeks to employ the applicant. The fee shall be paid by the  school district,
public charter school or education service district.
(8) Fees established under this section  shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of administrative
expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 4.  ORS 342.173 is amended to read:
342.173. Any school district  or education service district that employs any person not properly
licensed or registered by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, or licensed by the com-
mission but not assigned in accordance with rules of the commission, shall be subject to  sanctions
imposed by the commission. A sanction must be imposed according to rules adopted  by the com-
mission and is effective unless:
(1) The assignment is made with justification satisfactory to the commission.
(2) The person is employed as a teacher by a post-secondary  institution that is accredited by the
Northwest Commission on Colleges  and Universities, or its successor, and that has a contract with
a school district under which the person is teaching at the high school level. The contract shall  be
approved by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, including criteria  for a person’s
qualifications under paragraph (b) of this subsection. The contract shall:
(a) Be for a specific instructional assignment for which the district  does not have appropriately
licensed personnel either on staff or available to be placed on staff after a reasonably diligent
search;
(b) Provide evidence that the person’s qualifications are appropriate for the assignment;
(c) Allow the person to teach no more than two high school units of credit or the  equivalent
per year; and
(d) Not be valid during a school closure, strike or summer session.
(3) The person is teaching an online course originating outside this state.
(4) The person is [ teaching] employed as provided by ORS 342.125 [ (1)(b)] (2).
SPONSORSHIP OF PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS
BY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
SECTION 5.
 ORS 338.005 is amended to read:
338.005. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Applicant” means any person or group that develops and submits a written proposal for  a
public charter school to a sponsor.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 4
[(2) “Institution of higher education” means  a community college operated under ORS chapter 341,
a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University. ]
[(3)] (2) “Public charter school” means an elementary or secondary  school offering a compre-
hensive instructional program operating under a written agreement entered into between a  sponsor
and an applicant and operating pursuant to this chapter.
[(4)] (3) “Remote and necessary school  district” means a school district that offers kindergarten
through grade 12 and has:
(a) An average daily membership (ADM), as defined in ORS 327.006, in the prior fiscal year of
less than 110; and
(b) A school that is located, by the  nearest traveled road, more than 20 miles from the nearest
school or from a city with a population of more than 5,000.
[(5)] (4) “Sponsor” means:
(a) The board of the  common school district or the union high school district in which the public
charter school is located that has developed a written charter with an applicant  to create a public
charter  school.
(b) The State Board of Education pursuant to ORS 338.075.
[(c) An institution of higher education pursuant to ORS 338.075. ]
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) “Virtual public charter school” means a public charter school that provides online
courses.
(b) “Virtual public charter school” does not include a public charter school that primarily serves
students in a physical location.
SECTION 6.  ORS 338.035 is amended to read:
338.035. (1) A public charter school may be established:
(a) As a new public school;
(b) As a virtual public charter school;
(c) From an existing public school or a portion of the school; or
(d) From an existing alternative education program, as defined in ORS 336.615.
(2)(a) Before a public charter school may operate as a public charter school, it must:
(A) Be approved by a sponsor;
(B) Be established as a nonprofit organization under the laws of Oregon; and
(C) Have applied to qualify as an exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  requirements of paragraph (a)(B) and
(C) of this subsection do not apply to:
(A) A school in a school district that is composed of only one school; and
(B) A school in a school  district that is a remote and necessary school district on the date the
school first begins operation as a public charter school.
(3)(a) Except for a public charter school that  is not required to comply with subsection (2)(a)(B)
and (C) of  this section as provided by subsection (2)(b) of this section, a member of the school dis-
trict board of the school district within which  a public charter school is located may not be a voting
member of the public charter school governing body.
(b) A member of the school district board of the  school district within which a public charter
school is located may act in an advisory capacity on the public charter school governing body.
(4) An applicant seeking to establish a  public charter school shall submit a proposal pursuant
to ORS 338.045 to the school district board of the school district within which the public  charter
school will be located by the date identified by  the school district board. The school district board
shall identify a date that is at least 180 days prior to the date on which the public  charter school
would begin  operating and that provides a reasonable period of time for the school district board
to complete the approval process  described in ORS 338.055 and for the public charter school to be-
gin operating by the beginning  of a school year. An applicant may consult with the school district
board prior  to submitting a proposal, and the school district board may require an applicant to
submit a letter of intent within a reasonable period of time prior to submitting a proposal.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 5
(5) An applicant  seeking to establish a public charter school shall provide to the State Board
of Education a copy of any proposal submitted to a school district board  under ORS 338.045 and a
copy of any subsequent approval by the school district board.
(6)(a) One or more, but not all, schools in a school district may become public charter schools.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, a school in a school district that is com-
posed of only one school may  become a public charter school. For a public charter school that is
the only school in the school district, the public charter school and the school district may be con-
sidered to be a single legal entity for the purposes of this chapter if:
(A) The public charter school is not required to comply with subsection  (2)(a)(B) and (C) of this
section;
(B) All of the members of the school district  board are voting members of the public charter
school governing body as allowed by subsection (3)(a) of this section;
(C) The school district and the public charter school share employees; and
(D) The school district and the public charter school share assets and liabilities.
(7)(a) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (5)] (4) may not approve a public charter school  pro-
posal that authorizes the conversion of any private school  that is tuition based to a public charter
school.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, an entity described in ORS 338.005  [(5)] (4)
may authorize the conversion of an existing alternative education program, as defined  in ORS
336.615, to a public charter school.
(8) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (5)] (4) may  not approve a proposal for a public charter
school that is affiliated with a nonpublic sectarian school or a religious institution.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 338.055 is amended to read:
338.055. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a proposal submitted under ORS 338.045,  the school district board
shall determine whether the proposal is complete. A proposal is complete if the proposal addresses,
at least minimally, each element required by ORS 338.045 (2) and (3).
(b) The school district board shall notify an applicant  within 30 days after receipt of a proposal
if the proposal is not complete and identify the specific elements  of the proposal that are not com-
plete. The school  district board shall provide the applicant with a reasonable opportunity to com-
plete the proposal.
(c) A proposal may be disapproved  if the applicant has received a reasonable opportunity to
complete the proposal and the applicant does not provide a proposal that is complete.
(d) If the school district board disapproves a proposal as provided by  paragraph (c) of this sub-
section, the applicant may appeal the decision to the State Board of Education. The State Board of
Education may review the proposal only for completeness and may determine that the proposal is:
(A) Not complete and uphold the decision of the school district board; or
(B) Complete and remand the proposal to the school district board for consideration.
(2) Within 60 days after receipt of a completed proposal, the school district board shall hold a
public hearing on the provisions of the proposal.
(3) The  school district board shall evaluate a proposal in good faith using the following criteria:
(a) The demonstrated, sustainable support for the public  charter school by teachers, parents,
students and other community members, including comments received at the public hearing  held
under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The demonstrated financial stability of the public charter school, including the demonstrated
ability of the school to have  a sound financial management system that is in place at the time the
school begins operating and that meets the requirements of ORS 338.095 (1);
(c) The capability of the applicant, in terms  of support and planning, to provide comprehensive
instructional programs to students pursuant to an approved proposal;
(d) The capability of the applicant, in terms  of support and planning, to specifically provide,
pursuant to an approved proposal,  comprehensive instructional programs to students identified by
the applicant as academically low achieving;
(e) The adequacy of the information provided as required by ORS 338.045 (2) and (3);
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 6
(f) Whether  the value of the public charter school is outweighed by any directly identifiable,
significant and adverse impact on the  quality of the public education of students residing in the
school district in which the public charter school will be located;
(g) Whether there are arrangements for any  necessary special education and related services for
children with disabilities pursuant to ORS 338.165;
(h) Whether there are alternative arrangements for students and for  teachers and other school
employees who choose not to attend or who choose not to be employed  by the public charter school;
and
(i) The prior history, if any, of the applicant in operating a public  charter school or in providing
educational services.
(4) The school district board must approve a proposal or state in writing the reasons  for disap-
proving a proposal within 30 days after the public hearing held under  subsection (2) of this section.
(5)(a) Written notice of the school district board’s action shall be  sent to the applicant. If the
proposal is not approved:
(A) The reasons for the denial  and suggested remedial measures, if any, shall be clearly stated
in the notice sent by the school district board to the applicant; and
(B) The applicant may amend  the proposal to address objections and any suggested remedial
measures and resubmit the proposal to the school district board.
(b) The school district board shall approve or disapprove  the resubmitted proposal within 30
days after receiving it. If the  proposal is not approved, the applicant may appeal the decision of the
school district board to the State Board of Education.
(c) When the State Board of Education receives  an appeal under this subsection, the board may
review the resubmitted proposal only to determine whether:
(A) The school district board used the process required by this section  in denying the proposal;
(B) The proposal meets the criteria described in subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) The reasons stated by the school district board for the denial are valid.
(d) Following a review described in paragraph (c)  of this subsection, the State Board of Educa-
tion may:
(A) Uphold the decision of the school district board to disapprove the proposal; or
(B) Remand the proposal to the school district board for reconsideration.
(6)(a) Individual elements in a public  charter school proposal may be changed through the pro-
posal and chartering process by mutual agreement of the school district board and the applicant.
(b) If the  school district board and the applicant are unable to agree on a change during the
proposal or chartering process, the school district board or the applicant may  request mediation by
the State Board of Education.
(c) If the school district board and the applicant  are unable to reach an agreement following
mediation as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the proposal submitted  under ORS
338.045, without the change that was the subject of mediation, shall be the proposal that governs
the public charter school and:
(A) The parties may execute the charter for the public charter school based on the proposal;
(B) The applicant may withdraw the proposal; or
(C) The school district board may disapprove the proposal.
(7) Before an existing  public school is converted to a public charter school, the proposal for the
conversion must be approved by the school district board of the public school.
(8) Entities  described in ORS 338.005 [ (5)] (4) may not charge any fee to applicants for the pro-
posal process.
(9) Upon request by a school district, the State Board of Education may grant an extension of
any timeline required by this section if the district has good cause for requesting the extension.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 338.065 is amended to read:
338.065. (1)(a) Upon approval of  a proposal by a school district board under ORS 338.055, the
school district board shall become the sponsor of the public charter school.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 7
(b) Pursuant to ORS 338.075 (2) or (3), the State Board of Education  shall become the sponsor
of the public charter school.
[(c) Pursuant to ORS 338.075 (4), the institution of  higher education shall become the sponsor of
the public charter school. ]
(2) The sponsor and the applicant shall develop a written  charter that contains the provisions
of the proposal that have been duly approved by the sponsor and  public charter school governing
body. As provided by ORS 338.055 (6), the sponsor and the applicant may agree to change elements
of the proposal prior to incorporating them into the charter. The charter, when duly executed  by
the sponsor and the public charter school governing body, shall act as  the legal authorization for
the establishment of  the public charter school. The charter shall be legally binding on both the
sponsor and the public charter school governing body.
(3) The sponsor and  the public charter school governing body may amend a charter by joint
agreement.
(4)(a) The initial charter shall be in effect for a period of not more than  five years and shall be
renewed upon the authorization of the sponsor using the process established under this section.
(b) The first renewal of a charter shall be for the same time period as the initial charter.
(c) Subsequent renewals of a charter shall be for a minimum of five years but may not  exceed
10 years.
(5)(a) The renewal of a charter shall use the process required by this section.
(b) The public charter school governing  body shall submit a written renewal request to the
sponsor for consideration at least 180 days prior to the expiration of the charter.
(c) Within 45 days after receiving a written renewal request from a public charter school  gov-
erning body, the sponsor shall hold a public hearing regarding the request for renewal.
(d) Within 30 days after the public hearing, the  sponsor shall approve the renewal of the charter
or state in writing the reasons for denying the renewal of the charter.
(e) If the sponsor approves the renewal of the  charter, the sponsor and the public charter school
governing body shall negotiate a new charter within 90 days after the date on  which the sponsor
approved the renewal of the charter unless the sponsor  and the public charter school governing
body agree to an extension of the time period. Notwithstanding the time period specified  in the
charter, an expiring charter shall remain in effect until a new charter is negotiated.
(f) If the sponsor does not renew the charter, the  public charter school governing body may
address the reasons stated under paragraph (d) of this subsection  and any remedial measures sug-
gested by the sponsor and submit a revised request for renewal to the sponsor.
(g) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (b) to (f) of this subsection, a sponsor and a public charter
school governing body may agree in the charter of the school to a timeline  for renewing the charter
that is different from the timeline required by paragraphs (b) to (f) of this subsection.
(6)(a) If the sponsor does not  renew the charter based on the revised request for renewal sub-
mitted under subsection (5)(f) of this section, the public charter school governing body may appeal
the decision of the sponsor to the State Board of Education for a review of whether the sponsor used
the process required by this section in denying the renewal of the charter.
(b) If the state board finds that the sponsor used the process required by this section in  denying
the request for renewal, the state board shall affirm the decision of  the sponsor. A public charter
school governing body may seek judicial review of an order of the state  board pursuant to ORS
183.484.
(c) If the state board finds that the sponsor did  not use the process required by this section in
denying the request for renewal, the state board shall order the sponsor to reconsider  the request
for renewal.
(d) If after reconsideration pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection the sponsor does  not
renew the charter, the public charter school governing body  may seek judicial review of an order
of the sponsor pursuant to ORS 183.484.
(7) If the State Board of Education is the sponsor of a public charter school and the state board
does not renew the charter based on the revised request for renewal submitted  under subsection
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 8
(5)(f) of this section, the public charter school governing body may seek judicial review of an order
of the state board pursuant to ORS 183.484 for a review of whether  the state board used the process
required by this section in denying the request for renewal.
(8)(a) The sponsor shall base the charter renewal decision on a good faith  evaluation of whether
the public charter school:
(A) Is in compliance with this chapter and all other applicable state and federal laws;
(B) Is in compliance with the charter of the public charter school;
(C) Is meeting or working toward meeting the student  performance goals and agreements spec-
ified in the charter or any  other written agreements between the sponsor and the public charter
school governing body;
(D) Is fiscally stable and has used the sound financial  management system described in the
proposal submitted under ORS 338.045 and incorporated into  the written charter under this section;
and
(E) Is in compliance with any renewal criteria specified in  the charter of the public charter
school.
(b) The sponsor shall base the  renewal evaluation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
primarily on a review of the public charter school’s annual performance reports, annual audit  of
accounts and annual site visit and review as required  by ORS 338.095 and any other information
mutually agreed upon by the public charter school governing body and the sponsor.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 338.075 is amended to read:
338.075. (1) If a school district board disapproves a proposal to establish a public charter school
following reconsideration of a proposal pursuant to ORS 338.055 (5), the applicant  may request that
the State Board of Education review the decision of the school district board.
(2)(a) If the State Board  of Education reviews a decision of the school district board, as provided
by subsection (1) of this section, the State  Board of Education may review the decision only to de-
termine whether:
(A) The school district board used the process required by ORS 338.055 in denying the proposal;
(B) The proposal meets the criteria described in ORS 338.055 (3); and
(C) The reasons stated by the school district board for the denial are valid.
(b) Following a review described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the State Board of Educa-
tion may:
(A) Uphold the decision of the school district board to disapprove the proposal;
(B) Remand  the proposal to the school district board for reconsideration if the school district
board and applicant agree to the remand; or
(C) Consider becoming  the sponsor of the public charter school if the applicant agrees to the
sponsorship.
(3) An applicant may seek judicial review of an order of  the State Board of Education pursuant
to ORS 183.484. If the court finds that the decision of the State Board of Education is not  supported
by substantial evidence in the record, the court shall enter a judgment directing  the State Board
of Education to sponsor the public charter school.
[(4)(a) An institution of higher education may sponsor a public charter school only if: ]
[(A) The main campus of the institution of higher education  is located within 25 miles of the pro-
posed public charter school, based on the nearest traveled road; and ]
[(B) The institution of higher education first became a sponsor  of the public charter school prior
to July 1, 2017. ]
[(b) An institution of higher education  may sponsor only one public charter school in this state,
regardless of the number of campuses or locations of the institution of higher education. ]
[(c) If a public charter school has a sponsor that is  an institution of higher education and the
public charter school enters into  a contract with a third-party entity to provide educational services for
the public charter school: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 9
[(A) A member of the governing body of the public charter  school or the governing body of the
sponsor may not be an employee of the third-party entity, be a member of the governing  board of the
third-party entity or be any other representative of the third-party entity; ]
[(B) An employee or a member of the  governing board of the third-party entity may not attend an
executive session of the sponsor; ]
[(C) An employee of the public charter school may not promote the sale  or benefits of private sup-
plemental services or classes offered by the third-party entity; and ]
[(D) The educational services provided by the third-party entity must  comply with state standards
and requirements, and any provision of the contract with the third-party entity that does not allow for
the provision of educational services that comply with state standards and requirements is void. ]
SECTION 10.
 ORS 338.105 is amended to read:
338.105. (1) During the term of a charter, the sponsor  may terminate the charter on any of the
following  grounds:
(a) Failure to meet the terms of an approved charter or this chapter.
(b) Failure to meet the requirements for student performance stated in the charter.
(c) Failure to correct a violation of a federal or state law that is described in ORS 338.115.
(d) Failure to maintain insurance as described in the charter.
(e) Failure to maintain financial stability.
(f) Failure to maintain, for one or more consecutive years,  a sound financial management system
described in the proposal submitted under  ORS 338.045 and incorporated into the written charter
under ORS 338.065.
(2)(a) If a charter is terminated under subsection (1)  of this section, the sponsor shall notify the
public charter school governing body at  least 60 days prior to the proposed effective date of the
termination. The notice shall state the grounds for the termination.
(b) If the grounds for termination include failure to maintain  financial stability or failure to
maintain a sound financial  management system, the sponsor and the public charter school may agree
to develop a plan to correct deficiencies. Under a plan to correct deficiencies:
(A) The public charter school may attempt to correct any deficiencies  related to financial sta-
bility or to a sound  financial management system by a date identified by the sponsor, which may
not be less than 60 days from the date of the notice;
(B) The proposed effective date of the termination may be  extended to the date identified under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) The  sponsor may withhold up to 50 percent of the moneys owed to the public charter school
while the public charter school is  on the plan to correct deficiencies unless the withholding would
create an undue hardship, as determined pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education; and
(D) The sponsor must hold in trust any moneys withheld under  subparagraph (C) of this para-
graph until:
(i) The public charter school complies with the plan to correct  deficiencies, at which time the
public charter school is entitled to the moneys held in trust; or
(ii) The public charter school fails to comply with  the plan to correct deficiencies, at which time
the charter is terminated and the public charter school forfeits any claim to the moneys held in
trust.
(c) A  deadline to correct deficiencies under paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection may be extended
by mutual agreement of the sponsor and the public charter school.
(d) The public charter school governing body may request  a hearing by the sponsor in relation
to a termination of the charter or a plan to correct deficiencies.
(3) A public  charter school governing body may appeal a decision of a sponsor under this sec-
tion. The appeal shall be to:
(a) The State Board of Education if the sponsor is an entity described in ORS  338.005 [ (5)(a) or
(c)] (4)(a). The State Board of Education shall:
(A) Review only:
(i) The grounds for termination under this section as stated by the school district board; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 10
(ii) A plan to correct deficiencies; and
(B) Adopt by rule procedures to ensure a timely appeals process to prevent  disruption of
students’ education.
(b) The circuit court pursuant to ORS 183.484 if the sponsor is the State Board of Education.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this  section, a sponsor may terminate a charter imme-
diately and close a public  charter school if the public charter school is endangering the health or
safety of the students enrolled in the public charter school.
(b) The public charter school governing body may request a  hearing from the sponsor on the
termination of the charter under this subsection. The sponsor shall hold  a hearing within 10 days
after receiving the request.
(c) The public charter school governing body  may appeal a decision of a sponsor under this
subsection to the State Board  of Education. The State Board of Education shall hold a hearing
within 10 days after receiving the appeal request.
(d) Throughout the appeals process, the public charter school shall remain closed at  the dis-
cretion of the sponsor unless the State Board of Education orders the sponsor to open the public
charter school and not terminate the charter.
(5) Termination of a charter shall not abridge the public charter school’s  legal authority to op-
erate as a private or nonchartered public school.
(6) If a charter is terminated or a public charter school is dissolved:
(a) The assets of  the public charter school that were purchased with public funds shall be given
to the State Board of Education. The State Board of  Education may disburse the assets of the public
charter school to school districts or other public charter schools.
(b) All  student education records of the public charter school shall be transferred to the ad-
ministrative office of the school district in which the public charter school was located.
(7) A public charter school governing body may only terminate  a charter, dissolve or close a
public charter school at the end of a semester. If a charter is terminated  by the public charter
school governing body or  a public charter school is closed or dissolved, the public charter school
governing body shall notify the sponsor at least 180  days prior to the proposed effective date of the
termination, closure or dissolution.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 338.155 is amended to read:
338.155. (1)(a) Students of a public charter school shall be considered to be residents of the
school district in  which the public charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State
School  Fund.
(b) All amounts to be distributed from the State School  Fund for public charter schools shall
first be distributed to the school district in which the public charter school is located.
(c) For the purpose of determining the amounts to  be distributed to a school district from the
State School Fund  for a public charter school, the district extended ADMw described in ORS 327.013
shall be calculated:
(A) Except as provided  by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, as though the students enrolled
at a public charter  school are students enrolled at the public schools of the school district in which
the public charter school is located.
(B) By not including any portion of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year if the public charter school ceased to operate because of dissolution or closure or  because of
termination or nonrenewal of a charter.
(2) A school district shall contractually establish, with  any public charter school that is spon-
sored by the board of the school district, payment for provision of educational services  to the public
charter school’s students. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted average  daily member-
ship (ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Eighty  percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are  enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 11
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(3) A school district shall contractually establish, with  any public charter school that is spon-
sored by the State Board of Education [ or an institution of higher education ] and that is within the
boundaries of the school district, payment for provision of educational services  to the public charter
school’s students. The payment shall equal an amount per  weighted average daily membership
(ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety percent of  the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are  enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(4) The estimated amount of each school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw shall be
determined each year by the Department of Education and made available to all school districts.
(5) The school district in  which the public charter school is located shall transfer an amount
per weighted average daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is equal to  50
percent of the amount of the  school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as calculated under
ORS 327.013 that is not paid to the public charter school through a contract created pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section to  the Department of Education. [:]
[(a) For a public charter school sponsored by the State Board of Education,  the Department of
Education; or]
[(b) For a public charter school sponsored by an  institution of higher education, the institution of
higher education. ]
(6) The department may use any moneys received under  this section for activities related to
public charter schools.
(7) A school district and a  public charter school may negotiate to establish a payment for the
provision of educational services to the public charter school’s students  that is more than the min-
imum amounts specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(8) A school district shall send payment to a public charter school based  on a contract negoti-
ated under this section within 10 days after receiving payments from the State School Fund pursuant
to ORS 327.095.
(9)(a) A public charter school may apply for any grant that is available to school  districts or
nonchartered public schools from  the Department of Education. The department shall consider the
application of the public charter school  in the same manner as an application from a school district
or nonchartered public school.
(b) The department shall award  any grant that is available to school districts based solely on
the weighted average daily membership  (ADMw) of the school district directly to the public charter
school. This paragraph does not apply to any grant from the State School Fund.
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
FOR HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING COMMISSION
SECTION 12.
 ORS 350.360 is amended to read:
350.360. (1) As used in this section, “employee group” means  each category of employee em-
ployed by a public institution of higher education, including at least categories for:
(a) Administrative or management employees;
(b) Faculty employees; and
(c) Classified or professional nonfaculty employees.
[(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  establish baselines and conduct an an-
nual review of each public university listed in ORS 352.002 with  respect to the employment of all em-
ployee groups.  Each public university shall provide the necessary data for the commission’s report prior
to September  1 of each year. The commission shall use data available from a national post-secondary
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 12
data collection system within the United States Department of Education. The commission shall report
the results of the reviews to the Legislative Assembly and the Governor’s office prior to December 1
of each year. ]
[(3) The Office of Community Colleges and  Workforce Development shall determine definitions and
data that will be used for annual reviews  and conduct an annual review of each community college
district with respect to the  employment of all employee groups. The office shall use data available from
a national post-secondary data  collection system within the United States Department of Education. The
office shall report the results of the reviews to the Legislative Assembly and the  Governor before De-
cember 1 of each year. ]
[(4) An annual review under this section must include: ]
[(a) Examination of data related to the ratio of instruction provided by the  following faculty cate-
gories: ]
[(A) Full-time faculty; ]
[(B) Part-time faculty; and ]
[(C) Graduate assistants. ]
[(b) The pay differential for the faculty categories. ]
[(c) The average contracted wages for each employee group. ]
[(d) The number of employees in each employee  group within a public university or community
college district, and a ratio of the number of employees in each employee group to the number  of stu-
dents enrolled in the university or district, both full-time and part-time. ]
[(e) The health care and other benefits provided for each faculty category. ]
[(f) A recommendation  on whether a different method of data tracking would improve the ability
of the Legislative Assembly to obtain the most precise and relevant data  on staffing ratios without
placing undue financial burdens on public universities and community colleges. ]
(2)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall conduct an  annual review of
each public institution of higher education with respect to the employment of  all employee
groups at the institution. For  the purpose of conducting the annual reviews, the commission
shall determine definitions and data that will be used.
(b) Each public  institution of higher education shall provide the data required for the
purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection to the commission prior  to June 30 of each year.
The institution  must use the data the institution provided to a national post-secondary data
collection system  within the United States Department of Education by November 1 of the
previous year.
(c) The commission shall report the results of  the annual reviews to the Legislative As-
sembly and the Governor before December 1 of each year.
(3) The annual reviews  conducted under this section must include the following infor-
mation for each employee group and for both full-time and part-time employees:
(a) The total number of employees in the employee group;
(b) The total number of full-time equivalent positions worked by employees  in the em-
ployee group;
(c) The average number of employees supervised by a member of the employee group;
(d) The average salary of a member of the employee group;
(e) The ratio of students to employees in the employee group;
(f) The ratio of instruction among faculty groups; and
(g) The number of employees in the employee group eligible for health care  and other
benefits.
SECTION 13.
ORS 350.365 is repealed.
AVAILABILITY OF KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
SECTION 14.  ORS 336.095 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 13
336.095. (1)(a) A school district that  is not a union high school district must offer half-day
kindergarten and may choose to offer full-day kindergarten.
(b) A public charter school may choose to offer half-day kindergarten or full-day kindergarten.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule:
(A) Standards for half-day kindergarten and full-day kindergarten; and
(B) The minimum number of instructional hours required for half-day kindergarten  and full-day
kindergarten.
(d) Nothing in this subsection requires a school district to offer half-day  kindergarten in
a school where the school district offers full-day kindergarten.
(2) Every school district that is not a union high school district must  provide kindergarten fa-
cilities free of charge for  the kindergarten children residing in the district by operating the facilities
either singly or jointly with other districts or by contracting with public or private providers  that
conform to standards adopted by rule by the State Board of Education.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents a district school board from admitting free  of charge a child
who is a resident of the district and whose needs for cognitive,  social and physical development
would best be met in the school program, as defined  by policies of the district school board, even
though the child has not attained the minimum age requirement.
(4) Kindergarten that is offered as provided  by subsection (1) of this section shall be funded in
the same manner as other grades of the district are funded, except that the aggregate days mem-
bership of children in kindergarten shall be calculated as provided by ORS 327.006.
(5) Kindergarten is an integral part of the public school system of this state.
EDUCATOR ADVANCEMENT COUNCIL
SECTION 15.
 ORS 342.950, as  amended by section 57, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, section
8c, chapter 790, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 2, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2016, is  amended to read:
342.950. (1) The Network of Quality Teaching and Learning is established. The network consists
of the [ Department of Education ] Chief Education Office  and public and  private entities that re-
ceive funding as provided by this section to accomplish the purposes  of the network described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The purposes of the network are the following:
(a) To enhance a culture of  leadership and collaborative responsibility for advancing the pro-
fession of  teaching among providers of early learning services, teachers and administrators in
kindergarten through grade 12, education service districts and educator preparation providers.
(b) To strengthen and  enhance existing evidence-based practices that improve student achieve-
ment, including practices advanced by or described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820,  329.824, 329.838,
342.433 to 342.449 and 342.805 to 342.937.
(c) To improve recruitment, preparation, induction, career  advancement opportunities and sup-
port of educators.
(3) To accomplish the purposes of the network described in subsection (2)  of this section, the
Department of Education, subject to the direction and control of the [ Superintendent of Public  In-
struction] Chief Education Officer , shall distribute funding as follows:
(a) To schools, school districts,  education service districts, nonprofit organizations, post-
secondary institutions and consortiums that are any combination of those entities for the  purpose
of supporting the implementation and delivery of  common core state standards and other state
standards that indicate whether a student is prepared for college.
(b) To school  districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for the purpose
of providing teacher  and administrator evaluations and aligned professional development in a man-
ner that complies with the core teaching standards adopted as provided by ORS 342.856  and with
related standards prescribed by federal law.
(c) To school districts and nonprofit  organizations for the purpose of providing teachers with
opportunities for professional collaboration and professional development and  for the pursuit of ca-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 14
reer pathways in a manner that is consistent  with the School District Collaboration Grant Program
described in ORS 329.838.
(d) To school  districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for the purpose
of providing beginning teachers and administrators with mentors  in a manner that is consistent with
the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) To school districts, education service districts, nonprofit  organizations, post-secondary insti-
tutions and the tribes of this state for  the purpose of closing achievement gaps by providing and
improving the effectiveness of instruction and professional development, implementing  data-driven
decision making, supporting practice communities and implementing  culturally [ competent] respon-
sive practices.
(f) To school districts, nonprofit organizations and  post-secondary institutions for the purposes
of:
(A) Strengthening educator programs for educators at all levels to:
(i) Improve educator preparation, recruitment and leadership.
(ii) Advance the purposes of the Educators Equity  Act, to improve the cultural competence of
educators and to ensure educators are trained in culturally relevant educational practices.
(B) Supporting the development and sustainability of partnerships  between providers of early
learning services, public schools with any grades from kindergarten  through grade 12 and post-
secondary institutions.
(g) To school districts to ensure that a sufficient number of  kindergarten through grade five
teachers have received training to understand and recognize dyslexia and to  implement appropriate
instruction.
(h) To school  districts for the design and implementation of programs to provide profes-
sional development to educators on  strategies that decrease rates of school absenteeism
among students by using trauma-informed approaches in schools.
(4) The [ Department of Education ] Chief Education Office  shall provide strategic  direction to
the network by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to determine  best practices and evidence-based mod-
els.
(b) Convening [ an advisory group ] the Educator Advancement Council created by ORS
342.940 to guide network activities and expand the implementation of effective practices.
(c) Working with educator programs to ensure ongoing collaboration with education providers.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Creating and supporting a statewide plan for increasing the successful recruitment of high-
ability and culturally diverse candidates to work in high-need communities and fields.
(5) The Department of Education shall support the network by:
[(f)] (a) Developing a system that ensures statewide dissemination of best practices  and
evidence-based models.
[(g)] (b) Supporting the development  and implementation of standards-based curriculum, high-
leverage practices and assessments that  promote student learning and improve student progress in-
dicators for students who are enrolled in an English language learner program under ORS  336.079
and for students with disabilities.
[(h)] (c) Administering the distribution of funding as described in subsection (3) of this section.
[(5)] (6) The [ State Board of Education ] Chief Education Office  shall develop processes to es-
tablish the network and ensure the accountability of the network. The processes must  ensure that
the network:
(a) Gives preference to entities that have demonstrated success in improving  student progress
indicators.
(b) Delivers services for the benefit of all regions of this state.
(c) Is accountable for improving student progress indicators identified by the [ State Board of
Education] Chief Education Office or set forth in ORS 350.014.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 15
(d) Includes and connects education providers and leaders  from pre-kindergarten through
postsecondary education.
[(6)] (7) No more than two percent of all moneys received for  the purposes of this section may
be expended by  the Chief Education Office or the  Department of Education for administrative
costs  incurred  under this section. For the purpose of this subsection, the following are not consid-
ered administrative costs:
(a) Technical  assistance and direct program services provided to school districts and nonprofit
organizations;  and
(b) Any administrative costs incurred under ORS 329.838 related to the administration  of the
School District Collaboration Grant Program.
[(7)] (8) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the  Department of
Education to support  the network and perform any duties assigned to the department under this
section  or assigned to the department by the Chief Education Office . Any rules  adopted by the
State Board of  Education must be consistent with this section  and with actions taken by the Chief
Education Office to implement this section .
SECTION 16.  ORS 342.950, as  amended by section 57, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, section
8c, chapter 790, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 2, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2016, and section 15 of
this 2018 Act, is amended to read:
342.950. (1) The Network of Quality Teaching and Learning is established. The network consists
of the Chief  Education Office and public and private entities that receive funding as provided by this
section to accomplish the purposes of the network described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The purposes of the network are the following:
(a) To enhance a culture of leadership and collaborative  responsibility for advancing the pro-
fession of teaching among providers of early learning services, teachers and administrators  in
kindergarten through grade 12, education service districts and educator preparation providers.
(b) To strengthen and enhance existing evidence-based practices that  improve student achieve-
ment, including practices  advanced by or described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820, 329.824, 329.838,
342.433 to 342.449 and 342.805 to 342.937.
(c) To improve recruitment, preparation,  induction, career advancement opportunities and sup-
port of educators.
(3) To accomplish the purposes  of the network described in subsection (2) of this section, the
Department of Education, subject to the direction and  control of the Chief Education Officer, shall
distribute funding as follows:
(a) To schools, school districts, education service  districts, nonprofit organizations, post-
secondary  institutions  and consortiums that are any combination of those entities for the purpose
of supporting the implementation and delivery of common  core state standards and other state
standards that indicate whether a student is prepared for college.
(b) To school districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for  the purpose
of providing teacher and administrator evaluations and aligned professional development in  a man-
ner that complies  with the core teaching standards adopted as provided by ORS 342.856 and with
related standards prescribed by federal law.
(c) To school districts and nonprofit organizations for the  purpose of providing teachers with
opportunities for professional collaboration and professional  development and for the pursuit of ca-
reer pathways in a manner that is consistent  with the School District Collaboration Grant Program
described in ORS 329.838.
(d) To school  districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for the purpose
of providing beginning teachers and administrators with mentors  in a manner that is consistent with
the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) To school districts, education service districts, nonprofit  organizations, post-secondary insti-
tutions and the tribes of this state for  the purpose of closing achievement gaps by providing and
improving the effectiveness of instruction and professional development, implementing  data-driven
decision making, supporting practice communities and implementing  culturally responsive practices.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 16
(f) To school districts, nonprofit organizations  and post-secondary institutions for the purposes
of:
(A) Strengthening educator programs for educators at all levels to:
(i) Improve educator preparation, recruitment and leadership.
(ii) Advance the purposes of the Educators Equity  Act, to improve the cultural competence of
educators and to ensure educators are trained in culturally relevant educational practices.
(B) Supporting the development and sustainability of partnerships  between providers of early
learning services, public schools with any grades from kindergarten  through grade 12 and post-
secondary institutions.
(g) To school districts to ensure that a sufficient number of  kindergarten through grade five
teachers have received training to understand and recognize dyslexia and to  implement appropriate
instruction.
(h) To school districts for the design and implementation of programs  to provide professional
development to educators on strategies that decrease rates of  school absenteeism among students
by using trauma-informed approaches in schools.
(i) To educator networks established under ORS 342.943 for the purpose of  supporting
educator networks.
(4) The Chief Education Office shall provide strategic direction to the network by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to determine  best practices and evidence-based mod-
els.
(b) Convening the Educator  Advancement Council created by ORS 342.940 to guide network
activities and expand the implementation of effective practices.
(c) Working with educator programs to ensure ongoing collaboration with education providers.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Creating and supporting a statewide plan for increasing the successful recruitment of high-
ability and culturally diverse candidates to work in high-need communities and fields.
(5) The Department of Education shall support the network by:
(a) Developing a system that  ensures statewide dissemination of best practices and evidence-
based models.
(b) Supporting the development and implementation of  standards-based curriculum, high-leverage
practices  and assessments that promote student learning and improve student progress indicators for
students who are enrolled in an English language learner program under ORS 336.079 and for stu-
dents with disabilities.
(c) Administering the distribution of funding as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The Chief Education Office  shall develop processes to establish the network and ensure the
accountability of the network. The processes must ensure that the network:
(a) Gives preference  to entities that have demonstrated success in improving student progress
indicators.
(b) Delivers services for the benefit of all regions of this state.
(c) Is accountable for  improving student progress indicators identified by the Chief Education
Office or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(d) Includes and connects education providers and leaders from prekindergarten  through post-
secondary education.
(7) No more than two  percent of all moneys received for the purposes of this section may be
expended by the Chief Education Office or the Department of Education  for administrative costs
incurred under this section. For the  purpose of this subsection, the following are not considered
administrative costs:
(a) Technical  assistance and direct program services provided to school districts and nonprofit
organizations;  and
(b) Any administrative costs incurred under ORS 329.838 related to the administration  of the
School District Collaboration Grant Program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 17
(8) The State Board of Education may  adopt any rules necessary for the Department of Educa-
tion to support the  network and perform any duties assigned to the department under this section
or assigned to the department by the Chief Education Office. Any rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education must be consistent with this section and with  actions taken by the Chief Education
Office to implement this section.
SECTION 17. The amendments to ORS 342.950 by section 16  of this 2018 Act become op-
erative on June 30, 2018.
RESIDENT STATUS FOR STUDENTS IN DORMITORIES
SECTION 18. Sections 5 and 7, chapter 690, Oregon Laws 2017, are repealed.
SECTION 19.  ORS 339.133, as amended by section  6, chapter 690, Oregon Laws 2017, is
amended to read:
339.133. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed by the Department of  Human Ser-
vices or a tribal child welfare agency away from their parents  and for whom the department or
agency has placement and care responsibility, including placements  in foster family homes, foster
homes of relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(b)(A) “Person  in parental relationship” means an adult who has physical custody of an indi-
vidual or resides in the same household as the individual, interacts  with the individual daily, pro-
vides the  individual with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessaries and provides the
individual with necessary care, education and discipline.
(B) “Person in parental relationship” does  not mean a person with a power of attorney or other
written delegation of  parental responsibilities if the person does not have other evidence of a par-
ental relationship.
(c) “School district of  origin” means the school district where an individual was a resident be-
fore:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(d) “School of origin” means the school that an individual attended before:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3)  to (5) of this section, individuals between the ages
of 4 and 18 shall be considered resident for school  purposes in the school district in which their
parents, their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(b) Nonemancipated individuals between the  ages of 4 and 18 living outside the geographic area
of the school  district for such reasons as attending college, military service, hospital confinement
or employment away from home shall  be considered resident in the district in which their parents,
their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(c) Individuals living temporarily in a school district for the primary purpose  of attending a
district  school  may not be considered resident in the district in which they are living temporarily,
but shall be  considered resident in the district in which they, their parents, their guardians or per-
sons in parental relationship to them reside.
(3) Individuals considered legally emancipated  from their parents shall be considered resident
in the district in which they actually  reside, irrespective of the residence of their parents, their
guardians or persons in parental relationship.
(4)(a) An individual who is between the ages of 4 and 21 and who is placed in  foster care shall
be considered a resident of:
(A) The school district of origin; or
(B) The school district  where the individual resides due to placement by the Department of
Human Services or a tribal child welfare agency if a juvenile court determines it is not in the  best
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 18
interest of the individual  to continue attending the school of origin or any other school in the school
district of origin, based on consideration of all factors relating to the individual’s best interests.
(b) If a juvenile court makes a determination that it is not in  the best interest of the individual
to continue  attending the school of origin, the individual shall be immediately enrolled in a new
school, even if the individual is unable to produce records normally required for enrollment.
(c) Individuals who are  residents of their school district of origin pursuant to paragraph (a)(A)
of this subsection shall:
(A) Remain in the individual’s school district of origin and, if  applicable, the individual’s school
of origin for the duration of the individual’s time in foster care; and
(B) Be provided, free  of charge, transportation between the individual’s home and the
individual’s school district of origin or, if applicable, the individual’s school of origin.
(d) The Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, tribal child welfare
agencies and school districts shall collaborate to  ensure that the provisions of this subsection are
implemented.
(5)(a) Except as provided in ORS 327.006 (7) and 335.090, an individual whose legal residence is
not within the district but who attends school in the district  is considered a resident in the district
in which the individual attends school if the individual receives :
(A) Written  consent from both of the affected district school boards as provided by policies
adopted by the boards[ .]; or
(B) Written  consent from the district school board for the district in which the school
is located as provided by section 9, chapter 718, Oregon Laws 2011.
(b) An individual whose legal residence is not within the district but who attends school in the
district is considered a resident in the district in which the individual attends school if:
(A) The legal residence of the individual had been in the district in  which the individual attends
school before a boundary change was made to the district;
(B) The legal residence of the individual is no longer in the  district in which the individual at-
tends school because of the boundary change; and
(C) The individual has had the same legal residence and has continuously  been enrolled in a
school in the district since the boundary change.
(6)(a) Individuals who are foreign  exchange students and who are residing in Oregon in
a dormitory operated by a school district are considered to be  residents of the school district
in which the dormitory is located.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection:
(A) An individual may not be considered to be a foreign exchange student for more  than
one school year.
(B) An individual may be  considered to be a resident of a school district as provided by
this subsection only if, for the 2010-2011 school year, the  school district had foreign exchange
students who would have been considered residents under the provisions of this subsection.
(C) The number of individuals who may be  considered residents under the provisions of
this subsection may not increase relative to  the number who would have been considered
residents under the provisions of this subsection for the 2010-2011 school year.
(c) As used  in this subsection, “foreign exchange student” means an individual who at-
tends school in Oregon under a cultural  exchange program and whose parent, guardian or
person in parental relationship resides in another country.
SECTION 20.
(1) The amendments to ORS 339.133 by section 19 of this 2018  Act become
operative on July 1, 2018.
(2) The amendments to ORS 339.133 by section 19 of this 2018 Act apply to State  School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2018-2019 distributions.
SECTION 21.  ORS 339.133, as amended  by section 6, chapter 690, Oregon Laws 2017, and sec-
tion 19 of this 2018 Act, is amended to read:
339.133. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 19
(a) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed by the Department of  Human Ser-
vices or a tribal child welfare agency away from their parents  and for whom the department or
agency has placement and care responsibility, including placements  in foster family homes, foster
homes of relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(b)(A) “Person in parental relationship” means an adult who has physical custody of an  indi-
vidual or resides in the same  household as the individual, interacts with the individual daily, pro-
vides the individual with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessaries and provides  the
individual with necessary care, education and discipline.
(B) “Person in parental relationship” does  not mean a person with a power of attorney or other
written delegation of parental responsibilities if the person does not have other evidence of  a par-
ental relationship.
(c) “School district of origin” means the school district where an individual was  a resident be-
fore:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(d) “School of origin” means the school that an individual attended before:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) to (5) of  this section, individuals between the ages
of 4 and 18 shall be considered resident for  school purposes in the school district in which their
parents, their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(b) Nonemancipated individuals between the  ages of 4 and 18 living outside the geographic area
of the school district for such reasons as attending college, military service,  hospital confinement
or employment away from home shall be considered resident in the  district in which their parents,
their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(c) Individuals living temporarily  in a school district for the primary purpose of attending a
district school may not be considered resident in the district in which they are living  temporarily,
but shall be considered resident in the district in which they, their parents, their guardians  or per-
sons in parental relationship to them reside.
(3) Individuals considered legally emancipated from their parents  shall be considered resident
in the district in which they actually reside, irrespective of  the residence of their parents, their
guardians or persons in parental relationship.
(4)(a) An individual who  is between the ages of 4 and 21 and who is placed in foster care shall
be considered a resident of:
(A) The school district of origin; or
(B) The school district where the individual resides due to placement by  the Department of
Human Services  or a tribal child welfare agency if a juvenile court determines it is not in the best
interest of the individual  to continue attending the school of origin or any other school in the school
district of origin, based on consideration of all factors relating to the individual’s best interests.
(b) If a juvenile court makes a determination that it is not in  the best interest of the individual
to continue attending the school of origin, the individual shall be immediately enrolled in a  new
school, even if the individual is unable to produce records normally required for enrollment.
(c) Individuals who are residents of their school district of origin pursuant  to paragraph (a)(A)
of this subsection shall:
(A) Remain in the individual’s school district of origin and, if  applicable, the individual’s school
of origin for the duration of the individual’s time in foster care; and
(B) Be provided, free of charge, transportation between the individual’s  home and the
individual’s school district of origin or, if applicable, the individual’s school of origin.
(d) The Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, tribal child welfare
agencies and school districts shall collaborate to ensure that  the provisions of this subsection are
implemented.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 20
(5)(a) Except as provided in ORS 327.006 (7) and 335.090, an individual whose legal residence is
not within the district but who attends school in the district  is considered a resident in the district
in which the individual attends school if the individual receives[ :]
[(A)] written consent from  both of the affected district school boards as provided by policies
adopted by the boards .[; or ]
[(B) Written consent from the district school board for the  district in which the school is located
as provided by section 9, chapter 718, Oregon Laws 2011. ]
(b) An individual whose legal residence is not within the district but who attends school in the
district is considered a resident in the district in which the individual attends school if:
(A) The legal residence of the individual had been in the district in  which the individual attends
school before a boundary change was made to the district;
(B) The legal residence of the individual  is no longer in the district in which the individual at-
tends school because of the boundary change; and
(C) The individual has had  the same legal residence and has continuously been enrolled in a
school in the district since the boundary change.
(6)(a) Individuals who are  foreign exchange students and who are residing in Oregon in a
dormitory operated by a school district are considered  to be residents of the school district in which
the dormitory is located.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection:
(A) An individual may not be considered to be a foreign exchange student for  more than one
school year.
(B) An individual may be considered to be a  resident of a school district as provided by this
subsection only if, for the 2010-2011 school year, the school district had foreign exchange  students
who would have been considered residents under the provisions of this subsection.
(C) The number of individuals who may be considered residents under  the provisions of this
subsection may not  increase relative to the number who would have been considered residents under
the provisions of this subsection for the 2010-2011 school year.
(c) As used in this subsection, “foreign  exchange student” means an individual who attends
school in Oregon under a cultural  exchange program and whose parent, guardian or person in par-
ental relationship resides in another country.
SECTION 22.
(1) The amendments to ORS 339.133 by section 21 of this 2018  Act become
operative on July 1, 2019.
(2) The amendments to ORS 339.133 by section 21 of this 2018 Act apply to State  School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2019-2020 distributions.
SECTION 23.  ORS 339.133, as amended by section  6, chapter 690, Oregon Laws 2017, and
sections 19 and 21 of this 2018 Act, is amended to read:
339.133. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed by the Department of  Human Ser-
vices or a tribal child welfare agency away from their parents  and for whom the department or
agency has placement and care responsibility, including placements  in foster family homes, foster
homes of relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(b)(A) “Person  in parental relationship” means an adult who has physical custody of an indi-
vidual or resides in the same household as the individual, interacts  with the individual daily, pro-
vides the  individual with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessaries and provides the
individual with necessary care, education and discipline.
(B) “Person in parental relationship” does  not mean a person with a power of attorney or other
written delegation of  parental responsibilities if the person does not have other evidence of a par-
ental relationship.
(c) “School district of  origin” means the school district where an individual was a resident be-
fore:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 21
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(d) “School of origin” means the school that an individual attended before:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3)  to (5) of this section, individuals between the ages
of 4 and 18 shall be considered resident for school  purposes in the school district in which their
parents, their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(b) Nonemancipated individuals between the  ages of 4 and 18 living outside the geographic area
of the school  district for such reasons as attending college, military service, hospital confinement
or employment away from home shall  be considered resident in the district in which their parents,
their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(c) Individuals living temporarily in a school district for the primary purpose  of attending a
district  school  may not be considered resident in the district in which they are living temporarily,
but shall be  considered resident in the district in which they, their parents, their guardians or per-
sons in parental relationship to them reside.
(3) Individuals considered legally emancipated  from their parents shall be considered resident
in the district in which they actually  reside, irrespective of the residence of their parents, their
guardians or persons in parental relationship.
(4)(a) An individual who is between the ages of 4 and 21 and who is placed in  foster care shall
be considered a resident of:
(A) The school district of origin; or
(B) The school district  where the individual resides due to placement by the Department of
Human Services or a tribal child welfare agency if a juvenile court determines it is not in the  best
interest of the individual  to continue attending the school of origin or any other school in the school
district of origin, based on consideration of all factors relating to the individual’s best interests.
(b) If a juvenile court makes a determination that it is not in  the best interest of the individual
to continue  attending the school of origin, the individual shall be immediately enrolled in a new
school, even if the individual is unable to produce records normally required for enrollment.
(c) Individuals who are  residents of their school district of origin pursuant to paragraph (a)(A)
of this subsection shall:
(A) Remain in the individual’s school district of origin and, if  applicable, the individual’s school
of origin for the duration of the individual’s time in foster care; and
(B) Be provided, free  of charge, transportation between the individual’s home and the
individual’s school district of origin or, if applicable, the individual’s school of origin.
(d) The Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, tribal child welfare
agencies and school districts shall collaborate to  ensure that the provisions of this subsection are
implemented.
(5)(a) Except as provided in ORS 327.006 (7) and 335.090, an individual whose legal residence is
not within the district but who attends school in the district  is considered a resident in the district
in which the individual attends school if the individual receives written consent from  both of the
affected district school boards as provided by policies adopted by the boards.
(b) An individual whose legal residence is not within the district but who attends school in the
district is considered a resident in the district in which the individual attends school if:
(A) The legal residence of the individual had been in the district in  which the individual attends
school before a boundary change was made to the district;
(B) The legal residence of the individual  is no longer in the district in which the individual at-
tends school because of the boundary change; and
(C) The individual has had  the same legal residence and has continuously been enrolled in a
school in the district since the boundary change.
[(6)(a) Individuals who are foreign exchange students and who are residing in Oregon in  a
dormitory operated by a school  district are considered to be residents of the school district in which
the dormitory is located. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 22
[(b) For the purpose of this subsection: ]
[(A) An individual may not be considered to be a foreign exchange student for  more than one
school year.]
[(B) An individual may be considered to be  a resident of a school district as provided by this
subsection only if, for the 2010-2011 school  year, the school district had foreign exchange students who
would have been considered residents under the provisions of this subsection. ]
[(C) The number of individuals who may be considered residents under the provisions of this sub-
section may not increase relative to  the number who would have been considered residents under the
provisions of this subsection for the 2010-2011 school year. ]
[(c) As used in this subsection, “foreign exchange student” means an  individual who attends school
in Oregon under a cultural exchange program  and whose parent, guardian or person in parental re-
lationship resides in another country. ]
SECTION 24. (1) The amendments to ORS 339.133 by section 23 of this 2018 Act become
operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) The  amendments to ORS 339.133 by section 23 of this 2018 Act apply to State School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2020-2021 distributions.
NATIONAL ACCREDITATION
OF EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS
SECTION 25.  Section 2, chapter 756, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 9, chapter 756,
Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amendments to ORS 342.147 by section 8  [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 756, Oregon
Laws 2015, become operative on July 1, [ 2022] 2025.
NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION FUND
SECTION 26.  ORS 342.122, as operative until July 1, 2018, is amended to read:
342.122. (1) There  is created the National Board Certification Fund, separate and distinct from
the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the National Board Certification  Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) The Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission may accept from any source any grant,
donation or gift of  money or other valuable thing made to the commission for purposes of the Na-
tional Board Certification Fund.
(3) Moneys credited to the National Board  Certification Fund are continuously appropriated to
the commission  for the purposes set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. The commission
may draw checks or orders upon the State Treasurer in making disbursements from the fund for the
purposes stated in this subsection.
(4) Moneys in the National Board Certification Fund shall  be used to encourage public school
teachers and administrators in this state to apply for  and attain certification through the National
Board for Professional Teaching Standards or any other national professional  organization for
teaching standards designated by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(5) The Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission may disburse moneys from the National
Board Certification Fund to applicants for assistance with the direct  costs of seeking and obtaining
national board certification. The commission  shall manage the fund in a manner that provides sup-
port, but does not pay for all the costs of any one application. Additionally, the  commission shall
manage the fund to provide continuous support to as many applicants as possible.
(6) The  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall adopt rules that govern the dis-
bursement of moneys from the National Board Certification Fund consistent with this  section , in-
cluding requirements  that recipients of disbursements must be licensed by the commission
and employed with a public educational program in this state .
SECTION 27.
 ORS 342.122 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 23
342.122. (1) There is created the National Board Certification Fund, separate and  distinct from
the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the National Board Certification Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) The  National Board Certification Fund shall include any state or federal moneys made
available to the fund,  including moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly and federal mon-
eys made  available to improve teacher quality through professional development. The Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission may accept from any source any grant, donation or gift  of
money or other valuable thing made to the commission for purposes of the fund.
(3) Moneys credited to the National Board  Certification Fund are continuously appropriated to
the commission for the purposes set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. The  commission
may draw checks or orders upon the State Treasurer in making disbursements from the fund for the
purposes stated in this subsection.
(4) Moneys in the National Board Certification Fund shall be used to  encourage at least 150
public school teachers in this state to apply for and attain  certification each biennium through the
National Board for Professional Teaching Standards  or any other national professional organization
for teaching standards designated by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(5) The Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission may disburse moneys from the National
Board Certification Fund to applicants for assistance with the direct  costs of seeking and obtaining
national board certification, including reimbursement for the costs  of each of the components nec-
essary for certification and reimbursement for costs related  to participating in a cohort for certif-
ication. The commission may retain no more than 10 percent  of all moneys received under this
section during a biennium from state and federal  sources for the purpose of paying administrative
expenses incurred by the commission under this subsection.
(6) The  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall adopt rules that govern the dis-
bursement of moneys from the National Board Certification Fund consistent with this  section , in-
cluding requirements  that recipients of disbursements must be licensed by the commission
and employed with a public educational program in this state .
VIRTUAL PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS
SECTION 28.
 Section 8, chapter 327, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  The amendments to ORS 338.135 by section 7  [ of this 2013 Act ], chapter 327, Oregon
Laws 2013, become operative on [ July 1, 2018 ] the effective date of this 2018 Act .
SECTION 29.  ORS 338.135 is amended to read:
338.135. (1) Employee assignment to a public charter school shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) A public charter school or the sponsor of the public charter  school is considered the em-
ployer of any employees of the public charter school. If  a school district board is not the sponsor
of the public charter school, the school district board may not be the employer of the employees of
the public charter school and the school district board may not collectively bargain with  the em-
ployees of the public charter school. The public  charter school governing body shall control the
selection of employees at the public charter school.
(b) If a virtual public charter school or the sponsor of a virtual public  charter school contracts
with a for-profit entity to provide educational services through the  virtual public charter school, the
for-profit entity may not be the  employer of any employees of the virtual public charter school[ .]
unless:
(A) The employee is an administrator who does not have any teaching  responsibilities;
and
(B) Both the  executive officer of the sponsor and the public charter school governing
body approve employment by the for-profit entity.  The executive officer or governing body
may choose to grant approval under this subparagraph:
(i) For all employees of the for-profit entity who  meet the description in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 24
(ii) Based on  the job categories of the employees who meet the description in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph; or
(iii) On a case-by-case basis for each employee who meets  the description in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph.
(3) The school district board of the school district within which the public charter school is  lo-
cated shall grant a leave of absence to any  employee who chooses to work in the public charter
school. The length and terms of the leave of  absence shall be set by negotiated agreement or by
board policy. However, the length of the leave of absence may not be less than two years unless:
(a) The charter  of the public charter school is terminated or the public charter school is dis-
solved or closed during the leave of absence; or
(b) The employee and  the school district board have mutually agreed to a different length of
time.
(4) An employee of a public charter school operating within a school district who  is granted a
leave of absence from the school district and returns  to employment with the school district shall
retain seniority and  benefits as an employee pursuant to the terms of the leave of absence.
Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 to 243.782, a school district that was the  employer of an employee of
a public charter school not operating within the school district may make provisions for  the return
of the employee to employment with the school district.
(5) For purposes of ORS chapters 238 and 238A,  a public charter school shall be considered a
public employer and as such shall participate in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(6) For teacher licensing, employment experience in public charter schools  shall be considered
equivalent to experience in public schools.
(7)(a) Any  person employed as an administrator in a public charter school shall be licensed or
registered to administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(b) Any person employed as a teacher in a public charter school shall be licensed or  registered
to teach by the commission.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, at least one-half  of the total full-time
equivalent (FTE) teaching and administrative staff at the public charter school shall be licensed by
the commission pursuant to ORS 342.125.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650, a  public charter school shall be considered a school district
for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.782. An employee  of a public charter school may be a member
of a labor organization or organize  with other employees to bargain collectively. Bargaining units
at the public charter school may be  separate from other bargaining units of the sponsor or of the
school district in which the public charter school is located. Employees of a  public charter school
may be part of the bargaining units  of the sponsor or of the school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(9) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (5)] (4) may not waive the right to  sponsor a public
charter school in a collective bargaining agreement.
NOTE:
 Sections 30 and  31 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renum-
bered.
BEGINNING TEACHER AND ADMINISTRATOR MENTORSHIP PROGRAMS
SECTION 32.  ORS 329.788, as operative until June 30, 2018, is amended to read:
329.788. As used in ORS 329.788 to 329.820:
(1) “Beginning administrator” means a principal or superintendent who:
(a) Possesses [ a preliminary ] an administrative  license issued by the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed as a principal or superintendent by a school district; and
(c) Has been assigned for fewer than two school years in the administrator’s present position.
(2) “Beginning teacher” means a teacher who:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 25
(a) Possesses a [ preliminary] teaching license [ or reciprocal license ] issued by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed at least half-time, primarily as a classroom teacher, by a school district; and
(c) Has taught fewer  than two school years as a licensed probationary teacher in any public,
private or state-operated school in any state.
(3) “Mentor” means an individual who:
(a) Is an acting or retired teacher, principal or superintendent;
(b) Has met established best practice and research-based criteria as defined by the State  Board
of Education by rule;
(c) Possesses a  teaching or administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices
Commission;
(d) Has successfully served for five or more years as a licensed teacher, principal or super-
intendent in any public school; and
(e) Has been selected and trained as described in ORS 329.815.
(4) “Mentorship program” means a program provided by  a mentor to a beginning teacher or
administrator that includes, but is not limited to, direct classroom observation and consultation,
assistance in instructional  planning and preparation, support in implementation and delivery of
classroom instruction, development of school leadership skills and other assistance intended to assist
the beginning teacher or administrator to become a confident and competent  professional educator
who makes a positive impact on student learning.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 329.788 is amended to read:
329.788. As used in ORS 329.788 to 329.820:
(1) “Beginning administrator” means a principal or superintendent who:
(a) Possesses [ a preliminary ] an administrative  license issued by the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed as a principal or superintendent by a school district; and
(c) Has been assigned for fewer than two school years in the administrator’s present position.
(2) “Beginning teacher” means a teacher who:
(a) Possesses a [ preliminary] teaching license [ or reciprocal license ] issued by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed at least half-time, primarily as a classroom teacher, by a school district; and
(c) Has taught fewer than two school years as a licensed probationary teacher  in any public,
private or state-operated school in any state.
(3) “Educator network” means an educator network established under ORS 342.943.
(4) “Mentor” means an individual who:
(a) Is an acting or retired teacher, principal or superintendent;
(b) Has  met established best practice and research-based criteria as defined by the State Board
of Education by rule;
(c) Possesses a  teaching or administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices
Commission;
(d) Has successfully served for five or more years as a licensed teacher, principal or super-
intendent in any public school; and
(e) Has been selected and trained as described in ORS 329.815.
(5) “Mentorship program” means a program provided by  a mentor to a beginning teacher or
administrator that includes, but is not limited to, direct classroom observation and consultation,
assistance in instructional planning and preparation, support in implementation and  delivery of
classroom instruction, development of school leadership skills and other assistance intended to assist
the beginning teacher  or administrator to become a confident and competent professional educator
who makes a positive impact on student learning.
SECTION 34.
The amendments to ORS 329.788 by sections 32 and 33 by this 2018 Act  first
apply to teachers and administrators participating  in beginning teacher and administrator
mentorship programs during the 2017-2018 school year.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 26
CAPTIONS
SECTION 35. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 36. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 23, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-A) Page 27